Massachusetts, session 194th, S1773.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Massachusetts General Laws Section 129C of Chapter 140 is hereby amended by
inserting at the end the following new section:-
"(n) Any person who, while not being within the limits of their own property or
residence, or such person whose property or residence is under lawful search, and who is not
exempt under this section, shall on demand of a police officer or other law enforcement officer,
exhibit their license to carry firearms, or their firearm identification card or receipt for fee paid
for such card, or proof of exempt status under section 129C. Upon failure to do so such person
may be required to surrender to such officer said firearm which shall be taken into custody as
under the provisions of section one hundred and twenty-nine D, except that such firearm shall be
returned forthwith upon presentation within thirty days of said license to carry firearms, firearm
identification card, or proof of exempt status, or receipt for fee paid for such card or license as
hereinbefore described. Any person subject to the conditions of this paragraph may, even though
of 2

no firearm was surrendered, be required to produce within thirty days said license to carry
firearms, firearm identification card, or receipt for fee paid for such card, failing which the
conditions of section one hundred and twenty-nine D will apply. Nothing in this section shall
prevent any person from being prosecuted for any violation of this chapter."
of 2